District of Columbia statutes.
16-1021

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Child” means a person under the age of 16 years of age.

(2)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Lawful custodian” means a person who is authorized to have custody by an order of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or a court of competent jurisdiction of any state, or a person designated by the lawful custodian temporarily to care for the child.

(4)

“Relative” means a parent, other ancestor, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, or one who has been lawful custodian at some prior time.

May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-115, § 2, 33 DCR 2424
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 25(b), 36 DCR 492
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(l), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 16-1021.
This section is referenced in § 16-914.
Custody of children, see § 16-911.